California, session 20252026, SB51.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Changing between standard time and daylight saving time is disruptive to health, safety, and education.(b) The California Medical Association, California Sleep Society, American Academy of Sleep Medicine, National Sleep Foundation, Sleep Research Society, and Society for Research on Biological Rhythms advise against permanent daylight saving time and recommend permanent standard time due to impacts to health.(c) Permanent daylight saving time has historically been repealed due to its harm to health, safety, and education, after its trials during World War II and the 1970s.(d) Federal law permits standard time by exemption from daylight saving time as the only alternative to biannual changing of clocks.(e) Permanent standard time has been historically proven to last without incident for decades.(f) Neighboring states are considering moving to permanent standard time so coordination with those states regarding timekeeping is essential for consistency.(g) Permanent standard time has been historically proven to work without incident.SEC. 2. Section 6808 of the Government Code is amended to read:6808. (a) (1) The standard time within the state is that of the fifth zone designated by federal law as Pacific standard time (15 U.S.C. Secs. 261 and 263).(2) The state and all political subdivisions of the state shall observe the standard time pursuant to paragraph (1).(b) The state and all political subdivisions of the state shall be exempt from the provisions of federal law that establish the advancement of time (15 U.S.C. Sec. 260a).